Washington statutes.
RCW 35.37.010

Accounting—Funds.

Every city and town having less than twenty thousand inhabitants shall maintain a current expense fund out of which it must pay current expenses. It shall also maintain an "indebtedness fund," and if it has outstanding general indebtedness bonds, it must maintain a sinking fund therefor. If it maintains waterworks, lighting plant, cemetery, or other public works or institutions from which rent or other revenue is derived it must maintain a separate fund for each utility or institution. All moneys collected by such cities and towns from licenses shall be credited to the current expense fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.37.010. Prior: (i) 1897 c 84 s 1; RRS s 5635. (ii) 1897 c 84 s 2; RRS s 5636. (iii) 1897 c 84 s 9; RRS s 5643. (iv) 1897 c 84 s 10, part; RRS s 5644, part.]